District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-211.07

Conversion of limited partnership to limited liability partnership.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1107, 34 DCR 6856
as added Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1205(2), 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-499.26.